Louisiana, session 2026, HB436.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 33:4558 is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§4558. Exercise of police power over municipally-owned places of amusement
A. Any municipality or local governing authority may exercise unlimited
police power for the preservation of peace and order, comfort, convenience, and
good conduct upon all parks, playgrounds, swimming pools and other places of
amusement owned and operated by the municipality, within or outside their
corporate limits, may pass any ordinance necessary for these purposes, and may
impose penalties for violations of the ordinance. The police officers of the
municipality or local governing authority, which may include the appointment of
veterans honorably discharged as defined in R.S. 15:1199.23, may make arrests for
violations of the ordinance within or without the corporate limits of the municipality.
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 436 ENROLLED
B.(1) If employed by the municipality or local governing authority, a veteran
appointed pursuant to this Section shall meet all training requirements and
qualifications for employment.
(2) This Section does not prevent a municipality or local governing
authority from deputizing a veteran honorably discharged for the purpose of making
arrests for violations of an ordinance within or outside of the corporate limits of the
municipality. The municipality or local governing authority that deputizes a veteran
honorably discharged may require that the veteran be certified by the Council on
Peace Officer Standards and Training or be qualified by the Council on Peace
Officer Standards and Training, or both.
Section 2. R.S. 56:1688(A) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§1688. Park wardens; powers and duties
A. The secretary of the Department of Culture, Recreation and Tourism may
appoint competent men, which may include the appointment of veterans honorably
discharged as defined in R.S. 15:1199.23, to serve as state park wardens. A veteran
appointed pursuant to this Section shall meet all training requirements and
qualifications for employment.
* * *
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.